Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.175

Washington produced food.

Public schools, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010, providing school meals to students are encouraged to buy Washington produced food whenever practicable and cost is comparable to non-Washington produced food.

[ 2023 c 379 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 379: See note following RCW 28A.235.135.